Utah statutes.
78A-7-201.   Justice court judge eligibility -- Mandatory retirement.

(1)  A justice court judge shall be:

(a)  a citizen of the United States;

(b)  25 years of age or older;

(c)  a resident of Utah for at least three years immediately preceding his appointment;

(d)  a resident of the county in which the court is located or an adjacent county for at least six months immediately preceding appointment; and

(e)  a qualified voter of the county in which the judge resides.

(2)  Justice court judges are not required to be admitted to practice law in the state as a qualification to hold office but shall have at the minimum a diploma of graduation from high school or its equivalent.

(3)  A justice court judge shall be a person who has demonstrated maturity of judgment, integrity, and the ability to understand and apply appropriate law with impartiality.

(4)  Justice court judges shall retire upon attaining the age of 75 years.

